Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1279.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XX-G heading of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:ARTICLE XX-G1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 SEXUAL [VIOLENCE, DATING VIOLENCE,DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND STALKING EDUCATION,] MISCONDUCTPREVENTION AND RESPONSE ATINSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATIONAND PRIVATE LICENSED SCHOOLSSection 2. Section 2001-G of the act is amended to read:Section 2001-G. Scope of article.This article relates to college and university sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct education, prevention and response.Section 3. The definitions of "education program" and "student" in section 2002-G are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2002-G. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Education program." An evidence-based, trauma-informed sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct prevention and awareness education program under this article.* * *"Reporting party." A student or employee who reports having experienced an incident of sexual misconduct to an institution of higher education or private licensed school."Sex-based discrimination." Discrimination based on sex stereotypes, sex characteristics, pregnancy or related conditions, sexual orientation or gender identity."Sexual exploitation." Actual or simulated sexual activity 20250HB1279PN1451 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or nudity arranged for the purpose of sexual stimulation or gratification of an individual."Sexual harassment." Unwelcome sex-based verbal or physical conduct that interferes with, denies or limits an individual's ability to participate in or benefit from the institution's or school's educational programs and activities."Sexual misconduct." An incident of sex-based discrimination, sexual harassment, sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence, sexual exploitation or stalking.* * *"Student." A person who is enrolled on [a full-time] at least a half-time basis at an institution of higher education or private licensed school."Title IX coordinator." An individual designated by an institution of higher education or private licensed school to ensure compliance with Title IX requirements under 20 U.S.C. Ch. 38 (relating to discrimination based on sex or blindness).Section 4. Sections 2003-G(a), (b) and (c) and 2004-G of the act are amended to read:Section 2003-G. Education program.(a) General rule.--Institutions of higher education and private licensed schools shall establish and implement an education program for all students and employees in accordance with the following:(1) In developing or implementing an education program, institutions of higher education and private licensed schools shall consult with [a]:(i) Local law enforcement.(ii) An institution's or school's title IX coordinator.20250HB1279PN1451 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A local rape crisis center and domestic violence program, as appropriate and if available.(2) The educational program may not be on a platform which allows for students or employees to click through informational slides without demonstrating a comprehension of the subject matter.(3) The educational program shall be separate from orientation for freshmen and transfer students.(4) The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Rape and the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Domestic Violence, shall develop an online clearinghouse of model education programs and other resources to aid institutions of higher education and private licensed schools in fulfilling this requirement.(b) Requirements of educational program.-- Each education program shall provide the following:(1) A discussion of sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct.(2) A discussion of consent, including an explanation that the victim is not at fault.(3) A discussion of drug and alcohol-facilitated sexual violence.(4) Information relating to risk education, bystander intervention and personal protection.(5) Information on where and how to get assistance, including the importance of medical treatment and evidence collection, and [how] options to report sexual [violence] misconduct to campus authorities and local law enforcement[.], including the effect of each option and methods of reporting incidents of sexual misconduct 20250HB1279PN1451 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidentially and anonymously.(6) The possibility of pregnancy and transmission of sexual diseases.(7) Introduction of members of the educational community from:(i) Campus police or security and local law enforcement.(ii) Campus health center, women's center and rape crisis center.(iii) Campus counseling service or any service responsible for psychological counseling and student affairs.(iv) The confidential resource advisor designated under section 2006-J.(8) A promise of discretion and dignity.(9) A promise of confidentiality for victims of sexual [assault] misconduct to the extent allowable by law.(10) Information regarding confidential resources and services available for victims of sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct.(11) Information on the institution of higher education's or private licensed school's procedures for resolving complaints of alleged sexual misconduct and the range of sanctions or penalties that may be imposed on students and employees found responsible for a violation.(12) Information regarding how to implement supportive measures for reporting parties.(13) Opportunities for ongoing sexual misconduct prevention and awareness training and programming.[(b) (Reserved).]20250HB1279PN1451 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Notification of rights, accommodations and protective measures.--A concise notification of rights, accommodations and protective measures shall be made available in writing and on the institution of higher education's or private licensed school's publicly accessible Internet website to students and employees, including victims of [dating violence, domestic violence, sexual violence and stalking] sexual misconduct, regardless of where the incidences occurred, including information regarding:(1) Existing counseling, mental health, health care, victim advocacy, legal assistance and other services available for victims, both within the institution or school and in the community.(2) Available options and assistance regarding how to report to the institution or school, report to law enforcement, obtain protections from abuse and sexual violence protection orders, file for crime victims' compensation and assistance program and request protective measures or changes to academic, living, transportation, working situations or other educational activities.* * *Section 2004-G. Follow-up.An institution of higher education and private licensed school shall conduct at least one follow-up program for the students in the education program. The follow-up program may consist of the following:(1) Lecturers and interactive learning programs relating to sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct prevention and awareness.(2) Institutional activities relating to sexual 20250HB1279PN1451 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct prevention and awareness.(3) Videos and other educational materials relating to sexual [violence, dating violence, domestic violence and stalking] misconduct prevention and awareness.Section 5. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 2008-G. Staff training.(a) Implementation training.--An individual who participates in the implementation of an institution of higher education's or private licensed school's disciplinary process, including individuals responsible for resolving complaints of reported incidents of sexual misconduct and individuals responsible for conducting a meeting, hearing or other disciplinary proceeding or informal resolution process shall have training or experience in handling sexual misconduct complaints and the operations of the institution's or school's disciplinary process. The training shall include:(1) Information on working with and interviewing victims of sexual misconduct.(2) Information on particular types of conduct that constitute sexual misconduct, including dating violence, domestic violence, sexual assault and stalking.(3) Information on consent and the role drugs and alcohol may have in an individual's ability to consent.(4) The effects of trauma, including any neurobiological impact on an individual.(5) Ways to communicate sensitively and compassionately with a reporting party, including an awareness of responding to a reporting party with consideration of that party's cultural background and providing services to or assisting in 20250HB1279PN1451 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 locating services for that party.(6) Information regarding how sexual misconduct may impact students with disabilities.(b) Title IX coordinator and campus safety employees.--An institution of higher education and private licensed school shall ensure that the Title IX coordinator, each member of the campus police force and all campus safety personnel employed by the institution or school are educated in the awareness of sexual misconduct and in trauma-informed responses.Section 2009-G. Enforcement and penalties.After reasonable notice, opportunity for a hearing and determination that an institution of higher education or private licensed school has violated or failed to carry out any provision of this article or any rule adopted under this article, the department may impose a penalty on the institution or school for each violation not to exceed $150,000, which shall be adjusted for inflation annually, or 1% of an institution's or school's annual operating budget, whichever is lower. The department shall use civil penalties to provide oversight and enforcement of this article.Section 6. Article XX-J heading of the act is amended to read:ARTICLE XX-JPOSTSECONDARY INSTITUTION SEXUAL [HARASSMENT AND SEXUALVIOLENCE] MISCONDUCT POLICY AND ONLINE REPORTING SYSTEMSection 7. The definition of "postsecondary institution" in section 2001-J of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2001-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 20250HB1279PN1451 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Base survey." A base set of common questions recommended by the task force and approved by the department."Confidential resource advisor." An individual employed by or contracted with a postsecondary institution to provide trauma-informed support and resources to individuals affected by sexual misconduct."Dating violence." As defined in section 1553(f)."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Domestic violence." As defined in section 2333(e) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929."Domestic violence program." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions).* * *"Postsecondary institution[."]" or "institution." An institution located within this Commonwealth that is authorized to grant an associate or higher academic degree."Rape crisis center." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 5945.1 (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors)."Reporting party." A student or employee who reports having experienced an incident of sexual misconduct to a postsecondary institution."Residential student." A student who resides on the campus of a postsecondary institution during the academic year."Responding party." A student or employee who has been accused of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.20250HB1279PN1451 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Sex-based discrimination." Discrimination based on sex stereotypes, sex characteristics, pregnancy or related conditions, sexual orientation and gender identity."Sexual exploitation." Actual or simulated sexual activity or nudity arranged for the purpose of sexual stimulation or gratification of an individual."Sexual harassment." Unwelcome sex-based verbal or physical conduct that interferes with, denies or limits an individual's ability to participate in or benefit from the postsecondary institution's educational programs and activities."Sexual misconduct." An incident of sex-based discrimination, sexual harassment, sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence, sexual exploitation or stalking."Sexual violence." An act of sexual violence as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6402 (relating to definitions). "Stalking." An act of stalking as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking). "Student." An individual who attends a postsecondary institution, whether enrolled on a full-time, part-time, credit or noncredit basis, including an individual who has taken a leave of absence or who has withdrawn due to being a victim of sexual misconduct."Task force." The Task Force on Postsecondary Sexual Misconduct established under section 2005-J."Title IX coordinator." An individual designated by a postsecondary institution to ensure compliance with Title IX requirements under 20 U.S.C. Ch. 38 (relating to discrimination based on sex or blindness)."Trauma-informed response." A response involving an understanding of the complexities of sexual misconduct through 20250HB1279PN1451 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training centered on the neurobiological impact of trauma, the influence of societal myths and stereotypes surrounding the causes and impacts of trauma, understanding perpetrator methodology and how to conduct an effective investigation.Section 8. Sections 2002-J and 2003-J of the act are amended to read:Section 2002-J. Policy for postsecondary institution sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct.(a) Adoption.--A postsecondary institution shall adopt a clear, understandable written policy on sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct that informs victims of their rights under Federal and State law, including the crime victims bill of rights. The written policy shall be trauma-informed and developed in coordination with the postsecondary institution's Title IX coordinator and a local rape crisis center and domestic violence program, as appropriate and if available. An institution may consult with additional internal and external entities, including institutional administrators, personnel affiliated with on-campus and off-campus health care centers, local confidential resource advisors, residence life staff, students, law enforcement and the district attorney having jurisdiction in the city or town where the institution's primary campus is located. The written policy shall be developed in a culturally competent manner in order to reflect the diverse needs of all students. The written policy shall include:(1) Procedures by which students and employees at the postsecondary institution may report or disclose alleged incidents of sexual misconduct regardless of where the incident occurred.(2) Information on where to receive emergency assistance 20250HB1279PN1451 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following an alleged incident of sexual misconduct, including:(i) The name and location of the nearest medical facility where an individual may request that a medical forensic exam be administered by a trained sexual violence forensic health care provider and information on transportation options and reimbursement for travel costs, if any.(ii) The contact information for a rape crisis center and a domestic violence center and a description of the services provided by the centers.(iii) The telephone number and website for a national 24-hour hotline and any State or local resources that provide information on sexual misconduct.(iv) Information on programs that may provide financial assistance to a student for the cost of emergency medical assistance.(v) An updated list of designated "responsible employees" under Title IX and the obligations to ensure transparency.(3) Descriptions of and contact information for the types of counseling, health, safety, academic and other support services available within the local community or region or through a rape crisis center or domestic violence center.(4) The name and contact information for organizations that support students accused of sexual misconduct, which shall include the name and contact information for a confidential resource advisor.(5) A description of the role of and services provided 20250HB1279PN1451 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the confidential resource advisor.(6) The name and contact information of the postsecondary institution's Title IX coordinator.(7) The rights and obligations of students and employees to:(i) Notify or decline to notify law enforcement, including campus, local and State police, of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.(ii) Receive assistance from campus authorities with making a notification of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.(iii) Obtain a court- or institution-issued protective order against a responding party of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.(8) The process for requesting supportive measures reasonably available from the postsecondary institution, which shall include:(i) Options for changing academic, living, campus transportation or working arrangements, or taking a leave of absence in response to an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.(ii) Information on how to request supportive measures listed under subparagraph (i).(iii) The process to have supportive measures reviewed.(9) The contact information for the closest law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over matters involving sexual misconduct and the:(i) Procedures for students to notify the postsecondary institution that a protective order has 20250HB1279PN1451 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been issued under Federal or State law.(ii) Postsecondary institution's responsibilities upon receipt of notice under subparagraph (i).(10) A summary of the postsecondary institution's procedures for investigating, adjudicating and resolving complaints of alleged sexual misconduct, including an explanation of all procedures which shall be followed to obtain investigatory reports and gather evidence, an explanation of potential sanctions which may be imposed and clear statements advising students that:(i) The process shall be uniformly applied for all disciplinary proceedings relating to any allegations of sexual misconduct.(ii) Timely and detailed notice shall be given if the postsecondary institution decides to proceed with an institutional disciplinary process to the reporting party and the responding party which shall describe the date, time and location, if known, and a summary of the factual allegations concerning the violation.(iii) A postsecondary institution shall provide both the reporting party and the responding party with written notice in advance of a disciplinary hearing to provide both parties with the opportunity to meaningfully exercise their rights to a proceeding that is prompt, fair and impartial, which shall include the opportunity for both parties to present witnesses and other evidence, and any other due process rights afforded under institutional policy. The written notice shall include the information required to be posted on the postsecondary institution's publicly accessible Internet 20250HB1279PN1451 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 website under this article.(iv) The reporting party and the responding party of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct may be accompanied by an advisor and support person of their choice, which may include an advocate and counsel, to meet with the investigator of the postsecondary institution or other fact finder, and may consult with an advisor and support person, which may include an advocate and counsel, during any meetings and disciplinary proceedings. The institution may establish rules regarding how the proceedings will be conducted, including guidelines on the extent to which an advisor or support person for a reporting party or responding party may participate in a meeting or disciplinary proceeding and any limitations on participation which shall apply equally to both parties. The postsecondary institution shall adopt reasonable measures to provide for the involvement of an advisor and support person for each party, but the availability of an advisor or support person shall not significantly delay a meeting or disciplinary proceeding.(v) The reporting party and the responding party shall be provided with a copy of the institution's policies regarding the submission and consideration of evidence that may be used during a disciplinary proceeding and shall have equal opportunity to present evidence and witnesses on their behalf during a disciplinary proceeding. Each party shall be provided with an equal opportunity to inspect and review all relevant evidence that shall be relied on in the 20250HB1279PN1451 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination of discipline before a determination is made.(vi) There shall be restrictions on evidence considered by a fact finder, including the use of evidence of prior sexual activity or character witnesses.(vii) The investigation and adjudication of alleged sexual misconduct is not an adversarial process between the reporting party, the responding party and the witnesses, but rather a process for postsecondary institutions to comply with their obligations under existing law. The reporting party does not have the burden to prove, nor does the responding party have the burden to disprove, the underlying allegation or allegations of sexual misconduct.(viii) The reporting party and the responding party shall be informed in writing of the results of a disciplinary proceeding not later than seven business days after a final determination of a complaint, not including any time for appeal, unless good cause for additional time is shown. The reporting party and the responding party shall be informed of any process for appealing the decision.(ix) A postsecondary institution shall offer an appeal as a result of procedural errors, previously unavailable relevant evidence that could significantly impact the outcome of a case, conflict of interest or bias and where the sanction is disproportionate to the findings, the reporting party and the responding party shall be provided with an equal opportunity to appeal decisions regarding responsibility or sanctions.20250HB1279PN1451 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) A postsecondary institution shall not disclose the identity of the reporting party or the responding party, except as necessary to carry out a disciplinary process or as permitted under Federal or State law and shall not share information which identifies domicile, the location of employment or phone, email or other contact information or information that may disclose the location of either party to the adverse party, unless the information provided is intended to ensure the safety of either party.(xi) The postsecondary institution's disciplinary proceedings may not serve as a substitute for the criminal legal process.(11) A summary of the postsecondary institution's employee disciplinary process as it pertains to sexual misconduct.(12) The range of sanctions or penalties the postsecondary institution may impose on students and employees found responsible for a violation of the applicable institutional policy prohibiting acts of sexual misconduct.(a.1) Review.--A postsecondary institution shall provide draft policies and substantive changes by electronic or regular mail to internal and external entities, with instructions on how to comment and a reasonable length of time in which comments shall be accepted. Once an institution has adopted a written policy as required under subsection (a), the opportunity for review and comment by internal and external entities shall only apply to substantive changes to that policy.(b) Report.--The sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct policy under subsection (a) shall include a provision 20250HB1279PN1451 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that a witness or victim of an incident of sexual [harassment or sexual violence] misconduct who reports the incident in good faith will not be sanctioned by the institution for admitting in the report to a violation of the institution's student conduct policy on the personal use of drugs or alcohol.(c) Model policy.--The [Department of Education] department shall develop a model policy that, at a minimum, includes the requirements under subsection (a) and make the model policy available to postsecondary institutions. A postsecondary institution may adopt the model policy as the policy of the institution on sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct.(d) Availability of policy.--A postsecondary institution shall make the written policy adopted under subsection (a) publicly available on campus in locations where students regularly congregate, including dining and recreational facilities, libraries, bookstores, student unions and student centers, and the common areas of dormitories and other student housing locations. Upon request, the institution shall make the policy available to an applicant, student or employee of the institution. The policy shall be made easily available on the institution's publicly accessible Internet website in an accessible format not later than the first week of classes in each academic year. The institution shall update the website containing the written policy on sexual misconduct on an annual basis.Section 2003-J. Online reporting system.(a) Establishment of online reporting system.--A postsecondary institution shall establish and maintain an online reporting system to receive complaints of sexual [harassment and 20250HB1279PN1451 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sexual violence] misconduct from students and employees. A report shall be investigated through the process established in the postsecondary institution's sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct policy. A postsecondary institution may not fail or refuse to investigate an anonymous report because it is anonymous.(b) Anonymous reports.--The online reporting system shall permit anonymous reports, which shall be investigated in accordance with subsection (a).(c) Required information.--A postsecondary institution shall provide students and employees making reports under this section with the following:(1) Information regarding who will receive and have access to the reports filed.(2) How information gathered through the online reporting system will be used.(3) Contact information for on-campus and off-campus organizations serving victims of sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct.(d) Statement.--The online reporting system shall prominently post the online system's policy regarding reports and investigations of sexual [harassment and sexual violence] misconduct and shall encourage individuals to review the policy for more information about procedures and resources.(e) Access to data.--A postsecondary institution shall limit access to the data collected, created or maintained under subsection (a) to only the data subject and as follows:(1) Only individuals with explicit authorization from a postsecondary institution may enter, update, access, share or disseminate electronic data related to an incident of sexual 20250HB1279PN1451 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [harassment or sexual violence] misconduct collected, created or maintained under this section.(2) The ability of an authorized individual to enter, update, access, share or disseminate data must be limited through the use of role-based access that corresponds to the official duties or training level of the individual and the institutional authorization that grants access for that purpose.(3) Actions in which the data related to an incident of sexual [harassment or sexual violence] misconduct are entered, updated, accessed, shared or disseminated outside the postsecondary institution must be recorded in a data audit trail.(4) An institution shall immediately and permanently revoke the authorization of an individual determined to have willfully entered, updated, accessed, shared or disseminated data in violation of this section.(5) An institution or individual implementing, operating or working for the program may not be compelled to produce a record except pursuant to a court order.Section 9. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 2004-J. Sexual misconduct climate surveys.(a) Biennial survey.--A postsecondary institution shall biennially conduct a sexual misconduct climate survey of all students attending the postsecondary institution, which shall include, at minimum, all of the questions included in the base survey developed by the task force and approved by the department. The department shall provide a copy of the base survey to each institution biennially. An institution may append campus-specific questions to the base survey, provided that the 20250HB1279PN1451 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 questions do not require the disclosure of any personally identifying information and are trauma-informed.(b) Requirements.--A sexual misconduct climate survey conducted by a postsecondary institution shall:(1) Collect anonymous responses.(2) Include a "decline to state" and "not applicable" option for each question.(3) Be offered to all students, including those who are on leave or who are studying abroad.(4) Be administered in a manner to ensure that, to the greatest extent possible, an adequate, random and representative sample size of students complete the survey.(5) Be administered online.(6) Be provided with accommodations to individuals with disabilities.(c) Public information.--Within 120 days after completion of a sexual misconduct climate survey, a postsecondary institution shall:(1) Submit a summary of the results of the sexual misconduct climate survey to the department.(2) Publish each of the following on the institution's publicly accessible Internet website in a manner that does not personally identify any student:(i) The summary of the results of the sexual misconduct climate survey conducted under subsection (a).(ii) The annual security report completed in compliance with 20 U.S.C. § 1092(f) (relating to institutional and financial assistance information for students).(iii) A link to the department's Statewide sexual 20250HB1279PN1451 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 misconduct climate survey data repository created under subsection (d).(d) Data repository.--The department shall establish a data repository for all summaries of sexual misconduct climate surveys submitted by postsecondary institutions to the department. The department shall ensure that the sexual misconduct survey data is anonymized, aggregated and made available to the public in an easily accessible manner on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Rules and procedures.--In consultation with the task force, the department shall adopt rules and procedures, including deadlines for dissemination and collection of sexual misconduct climate survey information consistent across postsecondary institutions and consistent with the purposes of this article, and shall promote the effective solicitation to achieve the highest practical response rate, collection and publication of statistical information gathered from postsecondary institutions.Section 2005-J. Task Force on Postsecondary Sexual Misconduct.(a) Establishment.--The Task Force on Postsecondary Sexual Misconduct is established and shall consist of the following members:(1) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(2) The Chancellor of the State System of Higher Education or a designee.(3) The Attorney General or a designee.(4) The following appointed by the Secretary of Education:(i) An individual who represents this Commonwealth's postsecondary institutions.20250HB1279PN1451 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) An individual who represents community colleges.(iii) A Title IX coordinator from a four-year postsecondary institution.(iv) A representative from the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Rape or a designee.(v) A representative from the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Domestic Violence or a designee.(vi) A representative from the Every Voice Coalition or a designee.(vii) A researcher with experience in the development and design of sexual misconduct climate surveys.(viii) A researcher of statistics, data analytics or econometrics with experience in higher education survey analysis.(ix) A medical professional from a postsecondary institution health services program.(x) Two students representing an advocacy related group or organization from a public postsecondary institution in this Commonwealth.(xi) Two students representing an advocacy related group or organization from a community college in this Commonwealth.(b) Terms of membership.--(1) Membership on the task force shall be reflective of the fields of public health, survey design, Title IX, sexual misconduct response and prevention and the vast geographic makeup of this Commonwealth. Preference shall be given to individuals with a background, education and experience in 20250HB1279PN1451 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the fields of public health, survey design or Title IX requirements under 20 U.S.C. Ch. 38 (relating to discrimination based on sex or blindness) . (2) Appointed members of the task force shall serve for two-year terms which shall commence on the date of appointment.(3) Members shall continue to serve until member's successors are appointed.(4) Any vacancy of the task force shall be filled by the Secretary of Education.(5) Any vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term.(c) Quorum.--A majority of the task force shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.(d) Compensation.--The members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall, within the limits of available money, be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.(e) Development of base survey.--The task force shall develop the base survey for distribution to postsecondary institutions and provide institutions with any related recommendations regarding the content, timing and application of the sexual misconduct climate survey. The task force may make recommendations on legislative and policy actions or on enforcing and carrying out the provisions of this article and may undertake research, development and program initiatives consistent with this article. Subcommittees of the task force may meet as necessary. The task force shall deliver its base survey and related recommendations, including recommendations on achieving statistically valid response rates to each 20250HB1279PN1451 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 postsecondary institution no less than every two years and for the first time within a year of the effective date of this section.(f) Duties.--In developing the base survey, the task force shall:(1) Utilize best practices from peer-reviewed research and consult with individuals with expertise in the development and use of sexual misconduct climate surveys by postsecondary institutions.(2) Review sexual misconduct climate surveys which have been developed and previously utilized by postsecondary institutions in this Commonwealth and by other states that mandate campus climate surveys.(3) Provide opportunities for written comment from organizations that work directly with victims and survivors of sexual misconduct to ensure the adequacy and appropriateness of the proposed content.(4) Consult with postsecondary institutions on strategies for optimizing the effectiveness of the survey.(5) Account for the diverse needs and differences of this Commonwealth's postsecondary institutions.(g) Topics.--The base survey shall gather information on topics, including:(1) The number and type of incidents, both reported and unreported, of sexual misconduct at the postsecondary institution.(2) When and where incidents of sexual misconduct occurred, such as on campus, off campus, abroad or online.(3) Whether the sexual misconduct was perpetrated by a student, faculty or staff member, third-party vendor or other 20250HB1279PN1451 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual.(4) Student awareness of institutional policies and procedures related to campus sexual misconduct and awareness of on-campus and off-campus sexual misconduct support resources.(5) Whether a student reported sexual misconduct, and if so, to which campus resource or law enforcement agency, and, if not, the reason for the student's decision not to report.(6) Whether a student disclosed sexual misconduct to a friend or peer, family member, school faculty or staff member, a campus resource or a law enforcement official.(7) If a student reported sexual misconduct, whether the student was informed of or referred to State, local, campus or other resources or victim support services, including appropriate medical care and legal services.(8) If a student reported sexual misconduct, whether the student was provided protection from retaliation, access to school-based supportive measures or institution-based accommodations and criminal justice remedies.(9) If a student experienced sexual misconduct, contextual factors, such as the involvement of force, incapacitation or coercion.(10) Perceptions of campus safety among members of the campus community and confidence in the postsecondary institution's ability to protect against and respond to incidents of sexual misconduct.(11) Whether the student has decided to withdraw or take a leave of absence from the institution or considered transferring to another institution or withdrawing from the institution due to either being the reporting party or 20250HB1279PN1451 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responding party in an allegation of sexual misconduct.(12) Whether the student has withdrawn from any classes or been placed on academic probation as a result of sexual misconduct.(13) Whether the student experienced any financial impacts from sexual misconduct or the institution's response to the sexual misconduct.(14) Whether the student experienced any negative health impacts from sexual misconduct or the institution's response to a report, including post-traumatic stress disorder, anxiety, depression, chronic pain or an eating disorder.(15) Community attitudes toward sexual misconduct, including individuals' willingness to intervene as a bystander.(16) Other questions or topics determined by the task force.Section 2006-J. Confidential resource advisors.(a) Requirement.--A postsecondary institution shall designate at least one confidential resource advisor who shall:(1) Not be a student, Title IX coordinator, official who is an authorized administrator of disciplinary processes on behalf of the institution or a member of campus police or law enforcement.(2) Not have any other job responsibilities that may create a conflict of interest, including a general counsel, director of athletics, dean of students or any employee who serves on the judicial or hearing board or to whom an appeal may be made.(3) Be appointed based on the individual's experience and demonstrated ability to effectively provide victim 20250HB1279PN1451 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services related to sexual misconduct.(4) Notify all institution staff who are involved in providing or enforcing supportive measures or accommodations of their duties in writing.(b) Services.--A postsecondary institution may partner with a Statewide or local rape crisis center to provide a confidential resource advisor under this section. An institution that enrolls fewer than 1,000 residential students may partner with another postsecondary institution or rape crisis center or domestic violence center within this Commonwealth to provide the services required under this section. An institution shall ensure that any partnership entered into under this subsection results in a confidential resource advisor being available to students or employees within a reasonable distance from the institution and any services being administered for free. The confidential resource advisor shall maintain a physical presence on campus that provides the confidential resource advisor a place to meet discreetly and privately with students and employees in-person or remotely.(c) Training.--The confidential resource advisor shall receive training in the awareness and prevention of sexual misconduct, Title IX policies, postsecondary institution policies and in trauma-informed response, and shall coordinate with on-campus and off-campus rape crisis centers and domestic violence centers within a reasonable time after being designated as a confidential resource advisor. The department shall establish guidelines regarding the requirements of the training required under this subsection.(d) Information and resources.--The confidential resource advisor shall inform students or employees, or provide materials 20250HB1279PN1451 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 about how to obtain, including in written format:(1) Options to report sexual misconduct and the processes of each option.(2) Counseling services available on campus and through local rape crisis centers or domestic violence centers.(3) Medical and health services available on campus and off campus.(4) Campus escort services for student or employee security.(5) Available academic and residence life accommodations.(6) Student loan counseling regarding loan deferment, forbearance or other student loan programs for students considering temporary or permanent withdrawal or part-time enrollment.(7) Opportunities to obtain waivers for school-sponsored programs and activities as provided under section 2007-J.(8) The investigative, disciplinary and nondisciplinary processes of the postsecondary institution to address sexual misconduct.(9) The legal process carried out through Federal, State and local law enforcement agencies.(10) That the postsecondary institution's disciplinary process is not to be considered a substitute for the criminal legal process.(11) Any limits on the ability of the confidential resource advisor to provide privacy or confidentiality to the student.(e) Coordination of services.--If requested by a student or employee, the confidential resource advisor, using only the 20250HB1279PN1451 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requesting student or employee's identifying information, shall coordinate with the appropriate institutional personnel to arrange the following possible school-provided supportive measures, including those available through the memorandums of understanding with rape crisis centers:(1) Changes in academic, dining, housing or transportation services or on-campus employment.(2) Access to counseling and other mental health services.(3) Excused absences, academic counseling and tutoring.(4) Academic coursework accommodations.(5) Financial resources, including accommodations available under section 2007-J.(f) Alternative measures.--The supportive measures under subsection (e) may also be obtained, when appropriate, through disability services and the Title IX coordinator.(g) Report of sexual misconduct.--The confidential resource advisor may, if appropriate and if directed by the reporting party, assist the reporting party in contacting campus or local law enforcement agencies to make a report of sexual misconduct. The confidential resource advisor may attend an administrative or institution-based adjudication proceeding as the advisor or support person of the student or employee's choice. The confidential resource advisor shall:(1) Notify the student or employee of their rights and the postsecondary institution's responsibilities regarding protection orders, no contact orders and any other lawful orders issued by the postsecondary institution or by a criminal, civil or tribal court.(2) Provide confidential services to students and 20250HB1279PN1451 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employees.(3) Be considered a sexual assault counselor as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 5945.1(a) (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors).(h) Prohibition.--The confidential resource advisor may not:(1) Be required to report an incident to the postsecondary institution or a law enforcement agency unless otherwise required to do so by Federal or State law.(2) Disclose confidential information, including name, contact information, information on the alleged sexual misconduct or any personally identifying information without the prior written consent of the student or employee who shared the information.(3) Provide simultaneous services to the reporting party and the responding party of an alleged incident of sexual misconduct.(i) Cross examination.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the reporting party's and responding party's right of cross examination of the confidential resource advisor in a civil or criminal proceeding if the confidential resource advisor testifies after written consent has been given.(j) Actual or constructive notice.--Notice to a confidential resource advisor of an alleged act of sexual misconduct or a confidential resource advisor's performance of service under this article shall not be considered actual or constructive notice of an alleged act of sexual misconduct to the postsecondary institution at which the confidential resource advisor is employed or provides contracted services.(k) Conflict of interest.--If a conflict of interest arises for a postsecondary institution in which a confidential resource 20250HB1279PN1451 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advisor is advocating for a reporting party's need for sexual misconduct crisis services on campus or law enforcement services, the institution shall not discipline, penalize or otherwise retaliate against the confidential resource advisor for representing the interest of the reporting party.Section 2007-J. Waivers for student victims.(a) Waiver of minimum requirements.--A postsecondary institution shall waive any minimum grade point average, credit or other academic or disciplinary record requirement to be eligible for any school-sponsored program or activity, including scholarships and grants, for any student applicant or participant who has experienced sexual misconduct.(b) Who may issue waiver.--A waiver under subsection (a) may be obtained from a certified third party, including a confidential resource advisor, Title IX coordinator, law enforcement, academic advisors or disability resource center personnel.(c) Confidentiality.--Confidentiality related to a waiver under subsection (a) and related personally identifying information shall be maintained unless disclosure is specifically required for the purposes of executing an accommodation.(d) Withdrawal.--If a student withdraws from a class or a postsecondary institution as a result of being a victim of sexual misconduct, the postsecondary institution shall provide tuition credit, opportunities to withdraw or reenroll in a course without academic or financial penalty and continued eligibility for scholarships and honors.Section 2008-J. Data reporting requirements.(a) Report.--By October 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, a 20250HB1279PN1451 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 postsecondary institution shall report the following information to the department, the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives:(1) The total number of allegations of dating violence, domestic violence, sexual assault and stalking reported to the postsecondary institution's Title IX coordinator by a student or employee of the institution against another student or employee of the institution.(2) The number of law enforcement investigations initiated in response to complaints of sexual misconduct brought forward by students and employees of a postsecondary institution against another student or employee of the institution, if known.(3) The number of students and employees found responsible for violating the institution's policies prohibiting sexual misconduct and, of that number, how many individuals faced academic or employment disciplinary action.(4) The number of students and employees found not responsible for violating the institution's policies prohibiting sexual misconduct.(5) The number of disciplinary actions imposed by the institution as a result of a finding of responsibility for violating the institution's policies prohibiting sexual misconduct.(6) The number of students who requested accommodations and the number of accommodations that were granted under this article.(7) The number of students who reported an incident of 20250HB1279PN1451 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sexual misconduct and then took a leave of absence, transferred or withdrew from the institution.(b) Confidentiality.--The report prepared by a postsecondary institution under subsection (a) shall provide information in an anonymous manner that complies with Federal and State privacy laws.Section 2009-J. Enforcement and penalties.After reasonable notice, opportunity for a hearing and determination that an institution of higher education or private licensed school has violated or failed to carry out any provision of this article or any rule adopted under this article, the department may impose a penalty on the institution for each violation not to exceed $150,000, which shall be adjusted for inflation annually, or 1% of an institution's annual operating budget, whichever is lower. The department shall use civil penalties to provide oversight and enforcement of this article.Section 10. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1279PN1451 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718